sms/test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-kaakked_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - kââʹǩǩed: # Verb 'to wear by rubbing' - full paradigm
     kââʹǩǩed+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kââǥǥam
     kââʹǩǩed+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: kââǥǥak
     kââʹǩǩed+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kââkk
     kââʹǩǩed+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: kââʹǩǩep
     kââʹǩǩed+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: kââʹǩǩveʹted
     kââʹǩǩed+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kâʹǩǩe
     kââʹǩǩed+V+Ind+Prs+Sg4: kââʹjjet
     kââʹǩǩed+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: kââʹjj
     kââʹǩǩed+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kõʹǩǩem
     kââʹǩǩed+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: kõʹǩǩiǩ
     kââʹǩǩed+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kõõʹjji
     kââʹǩǩed+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [kõõʹjjim, kõõʹjjin]
     kââʹǩǩed+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: kõõʹjjid
     kââʹǩǩed+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: kõʹǩǩe
     kââʹǩǩed+V+Ind+Prt+Sg4: kõʹǩǩeš 
     kââʹǩǩed+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: kââkkam
     kââʹǩǩed+V+Pot+Sg1: kõõʹjjžem
     kââʹǩǩed+V+Pot+Sg2: kõõʹjjžiǩ
     kââʹǩǩed+V+Pot+Sg3: kõõʹjjež
     kââʹǩǩed+V+Pot+Pl1: [kõõʹjjžep, kõõʹjjžim, kõõʹjjžin]
     kââʹǩǩed+V+Pot+Pl2: kõõʹjjžid
     kââʹǩǩed+V+Pot+Pl3: kõõʹjjže
     kââʹǩǩed+V+Pot+Sg4: kõõʹjjžet
     kââʹǩǩed+V+Pot+ConNeg: kõõʹjjže
     kââʹǩǩed+V+Cond+Sg1: kââǥǥčem
     kââʹǩǩed+V+Cond+Sg2: [kââǥǥčiǩ, kââǥǥčeǩ]
     kââʹǩǩed+V+Cond+Sg3: kââǥǥči
     kââʹǩǩed+V+Cond+Pl1: [kââǥǥčim, kââǥǥčin, kââǥǥčep]
     kââʹǩǩed+V+Cond+Pl2: kââǥǥčid
     kââʹǩǩed+V+Cond+Pl3: kââǥǥče
     kââʹǩǩed+V+Cond+Sg4: kââǥǥčeš
     kââʹǩǩed+V+Cond+ConNeg: kââǥǥče
     kââʹǩǩed+V+Imprt+Sg2: kââʹjj
     kââʹǩǩed+V+Imprt+Sg3: kââǥǥas
     kââʹǩǩed+V+Imprt+Pl1: kââʹǩǩep
     kââʹǩǩed+V+Imprt+Pl2: kââʹǩǩed
     kââʹǩǩed+V+Imprt+Pl3: kâkkaz
     kââʹǩǩed+V+Imprt+ConNeg: kââʹjj
     kââʹǩǩed+V+Imprt+ConNegII: kõkku
     kââʹǩǩed+V+Actio: kââʹǩǩem
     kââʹǩǩed+V+Actio+Ess: kââʹǩǩmen
     kââʹǩǩed+V+Act+PrsPrc: kõõʹǩǩi
     kââʹǩǩed+V+Act+PrfPrc: kââkkam
     kââʹǩǩed+V+Pass+PrfPrc: kõkkum
     kââʹǩǩed+V+VAbess: [kââʹjjkâni, kââʹjjkani, kââʹjjǩeânai, kââʹjjǩeânnai, kââʹjjǩani, kââʹjjǩenai, kââʹjjǩâni, kââʹjjǩânai]
     kââʹǩǩed+V+Ger+Ess: kââʹjjeeʹn
     kââʹǩǩed+V+Ger+Instr: kââʹjjeeʹl
